Alabama, session 2026rs, HB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
35 Section 1. The Legislature finds all of the following:
36 (1) The voters, residents, and policymakers of Alabama
37 are entitled to transparency in the political and propaganda
38 activities of organizations that may be controlled by or under
39 the influence of foreign countries hostile to the interests of
40 the United States and the State of Alabama.
41 (2) In an increasingly globalized world, determining
42 whether an organization's political and propaganda activities
43 are funded by these foreign interests is often difficult.
44 (3) Legislation is needed to ensure the transparency
45 necessary to allow voters, residents, and policymakers to
46 evaluate whether political and propaganda activities are
47 funded by potentially hostile foreign actors.
48 (4) There are companies in the state that are owned or
49 controlled by foreign principals and that are managed by
50 Alabama residents and citizens. These companies employ
51 hundreds of hardworking Alabamians. The Legislature
52 acknowledges and appreciates these companies for their hard
53 work and contributions to Alabama's economy.
54 Section 2. As used in this act, the following terms
55 have the following meanings:
56 (1) AGENT OF A FOREIGN PRINCIPAL. Any person who acts
Page 2

(1) AGENT OF A FOREIGN PRINCIPAL. Any person who acts
57 as an agent, employee, representative, or servant, or
58 otherwise acts at the order, request, or under the direction
59 or control of a foreign principal: (i) whose actions are
60 financed in whole or in part by a foreign principal; and (ii)
61 who engages in political activity.
62 (2) COMMISSION. The State Ethics Commission.
63 (3) FOREIGN COUNTRY. All of the following:
64 a. The Democratic People's Republic of Korea.
65 b. The Islamic Republic of Iran.
66 c. The People's Republic of China.
67 d. The Russian Federation.
68 (4) FOREIGN PRINCIPAL. Any of the following:
69 a. A government of a foreign country, a political party
70 of a foreign country, or any member of a political party,
71 body, or organization of a foreign country.
72 b. A nonresident alien of a foreign country.
73 c. A partnership, committee, association, corporation,
74 limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
75 trust, professional corporation, or any other combination of
76 persons organized under the law of or having its principal
77 place of business in a foreign country.
78 d. A domestic partnership, association, corporation,
79 organization, or other combination of persons that is at least
80 20 percent beneficially owned by a foreign country, a
81 nonresident alien of a foreign country, or an entity organized
82 under the laws of or having its principal place of business in
83 a foreign country.
84 (5) FOREIGN SUPPORTED POLITICAL ORGANIZATION. A
Page 3

(5) FOREIGN SUPPORTED POLITICAL ORGANIZATION. A
85 political organization or partnership, committee, association,
86 corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
87 partnership, trust, professional corporation, or any other
88 combination of persons that has, within the past five calendar
89 years, received money or other things of value from a foreign
90 principal or an agent of a foreign principal and which engages
91 in political activity. The term does not include an industry,
92 trade, or professional association that exists to promote the
93 interests of its members, or any affiliated organization.
94 (6) POLITICAL ACTIVITY. Any activity that is performed
95 to influence any agency or public official of the state,
96 county, or municipality, or any state or local political
97 subdivision, or to influence the public within the state,
98 relating to the formulation, adoption, or change in the
99 policies or laws of the state or electing or opposing a
100 candidate for state or local public office.
101 Section 3. (a) No person shall act as an agent of a
102 foreign principal unless he or she has filed with the
103 Secretary of State a true and complete registration statement
104 as required by this act. Every person who becomes an agent of
105 a foreign principal, within 10 days of becoming an agent,
106 shall file with the Secretary of State a registration
107 statement, under oath, on a form prescribed by the Secretary
108 of State. The obligation of an agent of a foreign principal to
109 file a registration statement shall continue from day to day,
110 and termination of that status shall not relieve the agent
111 from his or her obligation to file a registration statement
112 for the period during which he or she was an agent of a
Page 4

for the period during which he or she was an agent of a
113 foreign principal. The registration statement shall include
114 all of the following, which shall be regarded as material for
115 the purposes of this section:
116 (1) The registrant's name, principal business address,
117 and all other business addresses in the United States or
118 elsewhere, and all residence addresses, if any.
119 (2) The status of the registrant as follows:
120 a. If an individual, his or her nationality.
121 b. If a partnership, the name, residence addresses, and
122 nationality of each partner, as well as a true and complete
123 copy of its articles of copartnership.
124 c. If an association, corporation, organization, or any
125 other combination of individuals or entities, the name,
126 residence addresses, and nationality of each director and
127 officer and of each individual performing the functions of a
128 director or officer, a true and complete copy of its charter,
129 articles of incorporation, association, constitution, and
130 bylaws and amendments thereto; a copy of every other
131 instrument or document and a statement of the terms and
132 conditions of every oral agreement relating to its
133 organization, powers, and purposes, and a statement of its
134 ownership and control.
135 (3) A comprehensive statement of the nature of the
136 registrant's business, including a complete list of
137 registrant's employees.
138 (4) A statement of the nature of the work of each
139 foreign principal for whom the registrant is acting, assuming
140 or purporting to act, or has agreed to act, the character of
Page 5

or purporting to act, or has agreed to act, the character of
141 the business, or other activities of every foreign principal.
142 If a foreign principal is an entity other than a natural
143 person, the statement shall also detail the ownership and
144 control to which the foreign principal is supervised,
145 directed, owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole
146 or in part, by any government of a foreign country or foreign
147 political party, or by any other foreign principal.
148 (5) The nature and amount of contributions, income,
149 money, or things of value, if any, that the registrant has
150 received within the preceding 60 days from each foreign
151 principal, either as compensation or for disbursement or
152 otherwise, and the form and time of each payment and from whom
153 received.
154 (6) A detailed statement of every activity that the
155 registrant is performing or is assuming or purporting or has
156 agreed to perform for himself or herself or any other person
157 other than a foreign principal and that requires registration
158 pursuant to this act.
159 (7) With regard to any person other than a foreign
160 principal for whom the registrant is acting, assuming or
161 purporting to act, or has agreed to act under circumstances
162 that would require his or her registration under this section,
163 all of the following:
164 a. The name, business, and residence addresses, and if
165 an individual, the nationality, of the person.
166 b. The nature and amount of contributions, income,
167 money, or things of value, if any, that the registrant has
168 received during the preceding 60 days from the person in
Page 6

received during the preceding 60 days from the person in
169 connection with any of the person's activities.
170 (8) A detailed statement of the money and other things
171 of value spent or disposed of by the registrant during the
172 preceding 60 days in furtherance of or in connection with
173 activities that require the registrant's registration under
174 this section and that have been undertaken by the registrant
175 either as an agent of a foreign principal or for himself or
176 herself or any other person or in connection with any
177 activities relating to the registrant becoming an agent of the
178 foreign principal.
179 (9) A detailed statement of any contributions of money
180 or other things of value made by the registrant during the
181 preceding 60 days to bring about the nomination or election of
182 a candidate for any office or to bring about the approval or
183 rejection by the voters of any proposed constitutional
184 amendment.
185 (10) Such other statements, information, or documents
186 pertinent to the purposes of this section as the Secretary of
187 State may from time to time require.
188 (b) Every agent of a foreign principal who has filed a
189 registration statement required by subsection (a), within 30
190 days after the expiration of each six-month period succeeding
191 such filing, shall file with the Secretary of State a
192 supplement thereto, under oath, on a form prescribed by the
193 Secretary of State, which shall set forth with respect to the
194 preceding six-month period such facts as the Secretary of
195 State may deem necessary to make the information required
196 under subsection (a) accurate, complete, and current with
Page 7

under subsection (a) accurate, complete, and current with
197 respect to that period.
198 (c) An agent of a foreign principal shall update the
199 information required by subsection (b) with the Secretary of
200 State every 90 days.
201 (d) The registration statement shall be executed under
202 oath as follows:
203 (1) If the registrant is an individual, by him or her.
204 (2) If the registrant is a partnership, by the majority
205 of the members thereof.
206 (3) If the registrant is a person other than an
207 individual or a partnership, by a majority of the officers
208 thereof or persons performing the functions of officers or by
209 a majority of the board of directors thereof or persons
210 performing the functions of directors, if any.
211 (e) A registration statement or supplement required to
212 be filed under this section shall be filed in electronic form,
213 in addition to any other form that may be required by the
214 Secretary of State.
215 Section 4. (a) No later than December 31 annually, each
216 foreign supported political organization operating within the
217 state shall register with the Secretary of State and provide
218 all of the following information:
219 (1) The name of the foreign supported political
220 organization, its business address, and the names, titles, and
221 addresses of all officers and directors of the foreign
222 supported political organization.
223 (2) If the foreign supported political organization is
224 affiliated with or a chapter of a national organization, the
Page 8

affiliated with or a chapter of a national organization, the
225 name of the national organization, its address, and the names
226 and addresses of its officers and directors.
227 (3) A detailed statement of the money and other things
228 of value spent or disposed of by the foreign supported
229 political organization during the preceding calendar year in
230 furtherance of or in connection with activities to influence
231 any agency or public official, local government entity, or the
232 public within the State of Alabama, including, but not limited
233 to, activities related to formulating, adopting, or changing
234 the policies or laws of this state or electing a candidate to
235 local or state public office.
236 (4) A detailed statement of any expenditures of money
237 or other things of value made by the foreign supported
238 political organization within the prior calendar year.
239 (5) A detailed statement of all money or other things
240 of value received by the foreign supported political
241 organization from a foreign principal or an agent of a foreign
242 principal during the preceding calendar year.
243 (b) A registered foreign supported organization shall
244 update the information required by subsection (a) with the
245 Secretary of State every 90 days.
246 Section 5. (a) Upon receipt of a complaint that an
247 agent of a foreign principal or a foreign supported political
248 organization has failed to comply with the registration and
249 reporting requirements of this act, or upon its own
250 determination, the Secretary of State shall investigate, and
251 upon finding a violation, impose civil penalties of up to ten
252 thousand dollars ($10,000) for failure to timely file a
Page 9

thousand dollars ($10,000) for failure to timely file a
253 statement required by this act.
254 (b) If the Secretary of State finds that a violation
255 was willful or a repeat violation of this act, the civil
256 penalties shall be not less than ten thousand dollars
257 ($10,000) nor more than two hundred thousand dollars
258 ($200,000) per such violation.
259 Section 6. (a) Any person upon whom a civil penalty has
260 been imposed pursuant to Section 5 may seek a review of the
261 penalty by filing a written notice with the Secretary of State
262 no later than 21 days after the date on which notification of
263 the imposition of the penalty was sent. The Secretary of State
264 shall refer the review to the State Ethics Commission.
265 (b) The commission may set aside or reduce a civil
266 penalty upon a showing of good cause. The person seeking
267 review shall bear the burden of proof.
268 Section 7. This act shall not apply to any entities
269 that are the subject of, or covered by, a qualified
270 divestiture under the Protecting Americans from Foreign
271 Adversary Controlled Applications Act (Public Law 118-50, Div.
272 H), including, but not limited to, any entity referenced in
273 Executive Order 14352 issued by the President of the United
274 States.
275 Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
276 1, 2026.
Page 10